sl-SI: Sorta ali kultivar sadja: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Medeni jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Drugo
sv: Fruktkultivar eller sort: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Övrigt
es: Cultivo o variedad de fruta: Ataúlfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Jaca miel; Monthong; XO; Otro
zh-CN: 水果栽培品种: 阿塔乌尔福; 黑刺 (D200); 卡文迪什; 嘎啦果; 澳洲青苹; 哈斯; 蜂蜜菠萝蜜; 金枕; XO; 其他
zh-TW: 水果栽培品種或品種: 阿塔爾福芒果; 黑刺 (D200); 香芽蕉; 嘎啦; 澳洲青蘋; 哈斯; 蜂蜜波羅蜜; 金枕頭; XO; 其他
pt-PT: cultivar ou variedade de fruta: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Jaca de mel; Monthong; XO; Outro
lt-LT: Vaisių kultivaras arba veislė: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Kita
da: Frugtsort eller kultivar: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Andet
de: Obstsorte oder -varietät: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honig-Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Sonstige
bg-BG: Сорт или разновидност на плодовете: Атаулфо; Black Thorn (D200); Кавендиш; Гала; Грани Смит; Хас; Меден джакфрут; Монтонг; XO; Друго
ro-RO: Soiul sau varietatea de fruct: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Altele
nl: Fruitcultivar of -variëteit: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Anders
nb: Fruktkultivar eller -sort: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honning-jackfrukt; Monthong; XO; Annet
hr-HR: Sorta ili kultivar voća: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Ostalo
en: Fruit cultivar or variety: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Other
th: พันธุ์ปลูกหรือสายพันธุ์ของผลไม้: อทอลโฟ; แบล็กทอร์น (D200); คาเวนดิช; กาล่า; แกรนนีสมิธ; แฮสส์; ขนุนน้ำผึ้ง; หมอนทอง; XO; อื่นๆ
fr: Cultivar ou variété du fruit: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Jacquier miel; Monthong; XO; Autre
ja: 果物の栽培品種または種類: アタウルフォ; ブラックソーン (D200); キャベンディッシュ; ガラ; グラニースミス; ハス; ハニージャックフルーツ; モントーン; XO; その他
sk-SK: Odroda alebo druh ovocia: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Iné
cs: Odrůda nebo kultivar ovoce: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Ostatní
tr: Meyve kültivarı veya çeşidi: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Diğer
vi: Giống hoặc loại trái cây: Xoài Ataulfo; Sầu riêng Black Thorn (D200); Chuối Cavendish; Táo Gala; Táo Granny Smith; Bơ Hass; Mít mật; Sầu riêng Monthong; Sầu riêng XO; Khác
ru: Сорт или разновидность фруктов: Атаульфо; Блэк Торн (D200); Кавендиш; Гала; Гренни Смит; Хасс; Медовый джекфрут; Монтонг; XO; Другое
ko: 과일 재배종 또는 종류: 아타울포; 블랙 쏜(D200); 캐번디시; 갈라; 그래니 스미스; 하스; 허니 잭프루트; 몬통; XO; 기타
fi: Hedelmän viljelylajike tai lajike: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey-jakkihedelmä; Monthong; XO; Muu
pt-BR: Cultivar ou variedade da fruta: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Jaca mel; Monthong; XO; Outro
it: Cultivar o varietà di frutto: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Altro
pl: Odmiana lub odmiana owoców: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Inna
hu: Gyümölcsfajta vagy -változat: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Egyéb
el: Ποικιλία φρούτων: Ataulfo; Black Thorn (D200); Cavendish; Gala; Granny Smith; Hass; Honey Jackfruit; Monthong; XO; Άλλο